Hawaii, session 2026, SB151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that geothermal resources can provide stable power and community benefits and are a viable alternative to biofuels.  Act 205, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022, appropriated $500,000 to the department of Hawaiian home lands as start-up funding for the exploration of geothermal resources on Hawaiian home lands, so that these resources could potentially be used for the generation, transmission, and production of electricity and renewable energy resources, including but not limited to hydrogen generation. The legislature recognizes that additional moneys are needed for the department of Hawaiian home lands to continue its efforts in collecting geothermal resources data.  Appropriating follow-up funding will allow the department of Hawaiian home lands to drill slim holes at certain sites on Hawaiian home lands, develop water wells, collect geophysical data, and hire consultants to help navigate the intricacies of geothermal development. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Establish a permitted interaction group to study, evaluate, and recommend strategies related to geothermal exploration, feasibility, extraction, and use on Hawaiian home lands; and (2)  Appropriate funds for the continued investigation, exploration, and identification of geothermal resources on Hawaiian home lands. SECTION 2. The department of Hawaiian home lands shall establish a permitted interaction group to study, evaluate, and recommend strategies related to geothermal exploration, feasibility, extraction, and use on Hawaiian home lands. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to drill slim holes, develop water wells, and continue geophysical data collection, investigation, exploration, and identification of geothermal resources on Hawaiian home lands. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of Hawaiian home lands for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. The department of Hawaiian home lands is authorized to utilize the funds appropriated in section 2 of this Act to hire consultants to assist the department in its geothermal development activities. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 31, 2050.